Missouri, session 2026, SB1720.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 9.289 as enacted by house bill no.
1738, one hundred first general assembly, second regular
session, and section 9.289 as enacted by house bill no. 2627,
one hundred first general assembly, second regular session, are
repealed and one new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as section 9.289, to read as follows:
[9.289. 1. The first full week in May
each year shall be known and designated as
"Tardive Dyskinesia Awareness Week". Tardive
dyskinesia is a movement disorder that is
characterized by random, involuntary, and
uncontrolled movements of different muscles in
the face, trunk, and extremities. The citizens
of this state are encouraged to observe the week
with appropriate events and activities to raise
awareness of tardive dyskinesia.
2. The provisions of this section shall
expire on August 28, 2026.]
9.289. [1.] The first full week of May each year
shall be known and designated as "Tardive Dyskinesia
Awareness Week". Tardive dyskinesia is a movement disorder
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1720 2
that is characterized by random, involuntary, and
uncontrolled movements of different muscles in the face,
trunk, and extremities. The citizens of this state are
encouraged to observe the week with appropriate events and
activities to raise awareness of tardive dyskinesia.
[2. The provisions of this section shall expire on
August 28, 2027.]
✓